Utah statutes.
13-42-129.   Notice of litigation.

No later than 30 days after a provider has been served with notice of a civil action for violation of this chapter by or on behalf of an individual who resides in this state at either the time of an agreement or the time the notice is served, the provider shall notify the administrator in a record that it has been sued.



Enacted by Chapter 154, 2006 General Session

